Utah statutes.
53A-11-1209.   Club membership.
(1)  A school shall require written parental or guardian consent for student
participation in all curricular and noncurricular clubs at the school.
(2)  Membership in curricular clubs is governed by the following rules:
(a) (i)  membership may be limited to students who are currently attending the
sponsoring school or school district; and
(ii)  members who attend a school other than the sponsoring school shall have,
in addition to the consent required under Section 53A-11-1210, specific
parental or guardian permission for membership in a curricular club at another
school;
(b) (i)  curricular clubs may require that prospective members try out based
on objective criteria outlined in the application materials; and
(ii)  try-outs may not require activities that violate the provisions of this
part and other applicable laws, rules, and policies; and
(c)  other rules as determined by the State Board of Education, school
district, or school.
(3)  Membership in noncurricular clubs is governed by the following rules:
(a)  student membership in a noncurricular club is voluntary;
(b)  membership shall be limited to students who are currently attending the
school;
(c) (i)  noncurricular clubs may require that prospective members try out
based on objective criteria outlined in the application materials; and
(ii)  try-outs may not require activities that violate the provisions of this
part and other applicable laws, rules, and policies;
(d)  a copy of any written or other media materials that were presented at a
noncurricular club meeting by a nonschool person shall be delivered to a
school administrator no later than 24 hours after the noncurricular club
meeting and, if requested, a student's parent or legal guardian shall have an
opportunity to review those materials; and
(e)  other rules as determined by the State Board of Education, school
district, or school.
